Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.260

Withdrawal from system—Refund of contributions—Waiver of allowance, when.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.280, should a member cease to be an employee, he or she may request upon a form provided by the department a refund of all or part of the funds standing to his or her credit in the employees' savings fund and this amount shall be paid to him or her. Withdrawal of all or part of the funds, other than additional contributions under RCW 41.40.330(2) by a member who is eligible for a service retirement allowance in RCW 41.40.180 or a disability retirement allowance in RCW 41.40.200, 41.40.210, 41.40.220, 41.40.230, or 41.40.250 shall constitute a waiver of any service or disability retirement allowance.

[ 1991 c 35 s 85; 1983 c 3 s 95; 1971 ex.s. c 271 s 9; 1963 c 174 s 12; 1949 c 240 s 18; 1947 c 274 s 27; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-27.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 271: See note following RCW 41.32.260.